Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1134.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that resource conservation practices can have broad application and value in Washington's public schools, especially if students are active participants in the programs and have appropriate education and leadership opportunities.(2) The legislature, therefore, intends to create new and expanded opportunities for student-involved resource conservation practices in public schools through the establishment of a voluntary green schools program that includes limited stipend funding for school-based advisors. The legislature further intends for the program, which will support awareness of environmental and climate resilience issues, to be funded with revenues from the climate commitment act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:(1) The Washington state green schools program is established in the office of the superintendent of public instruction to create and expand resource conservation practices in public schools, including: Waste reduction, energy reduction, water conservation, urban forestry education, and environmental preservation; and education and leadership opportunities for students seeking to promote conservation practices in their schools.(2) The green schools program is voluntary and is intended to:(a) Complement resource conservation programs for school districts and public schools that are established by counties or other entities by, in part, providing increased opportunities for student education and leadership in resource conservation practices;(b) Provide opportunities for school districts and public schools that cannot access or are not participating in resource conservation programs to establish and promote resource conservation programs that include student education and leadership opportunities;(c) Support instruction in climate curriculum aligned with the state learning standards for science and integrated environmental and sustainability;(d) Provide opportunities for school districts and public schools to collaborate with the department of natural resources for the purposes of schoolyard greening projects, schoolyard forests, and career-connected learning related to natural resource job opportunities within the national forest school forest system network and other urban forestry projects; and(e) Complement education programs related to resource conservation practices, and outdoor-based learning and education experiences, including outdoor schools.(3) For the purposes of this section, "public schools" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.150.010.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall establish and administer a program to provide school-based advisor stipend assistance to school districts for the purpose of creating or expanding resource conservation practices in accordance with section 2 of this act. In administering the stipend program, the office of the superintendent of public instruction may establish criteria for awarding stipend funds that prioritizes schools and school districts where more than 50 percent of the students are eligible for free and reduced-price meals.(2) School districts that participate in the Washington state green schools program established in section 2 of this act may, on forms developed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, apply for stipend funds for school-based advisors that assist students in learning about, promoting, and implementing resource conservation practices in school facilities. Stipend funds provided in accordance with this section may not exceed $600 per school, per year, but the amount received may depend upon the number of applicant school districts and available funding. Nothing in this section prevents school districts from providing additional funding for school-based advisors.(3) For the purposes of this section, "school districts" include school districts, charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW, and state-tribal education compact schools subject to chapter 28A.715 RCW.--- END ---